Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-931.01
Assault on an officer, an emergency responder, certain employees, or a health care professional using a motor vehicle; penalty.

(1) A person commits the offense of assault on an officer, an emergency responder, a state correctional employee, a Department of Health and Human Services employee, or a health care professional using a motor vehicle if:

(a) By using a motor vehicle to run over or to strike an officer, an emergency responder, a state correctional employee, a Department of Health and Human Services employee, or a health care professional or by using a motor vehicle to collide with an officer's, an emergency responder's, a state correctional employee's, a Department of Health and Human Services employee's, or a health care professional's motor vehicle, he or she intentionally and knowingly causes bodily injury:

(i) To a peace officer, a probation officer, a firefighter, an emergency care provider, or an employee of the Department of Correctional Services;

(ii) To an employee of the Department of Health and Human Services if the person committing the offense is committed as a dangerous sex offender under the Sex Offender Commitment Act; or

(iii) To a health care professional; and

(b) The offense is committed while such officer, firefighter, emergency care provider, or employee is engaged in the performance of his or her official duties or while the health care professional is on duty at a hospital or a health clinic.

(2) Assault on an officer, an emergency responder, a state correctional employee, a Department of Health and Human Services employee, or a health care professional using a motor vehicle shall be a Class IIIA felony.

Laws 1995, LB 371, § 31;

Laws 1997, LB 364, § 12;

Laws 2005, LB 538, § 4;

Laws 2010, LB771, § 7;

Laws 2014, LB811, § 21;

Laws 2020, LB1002, § 9.

Sex Offender Commitment Act, see section 71-1201.